Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 47. Gift Certificate Disclosures.

§ 59.1-530.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Gift certificate” or

“certificate”
means a certificate, electronic card, or other medium issued by a merchant that evidences the giving of consideration in exchange for the right to redeem the certificate, electronic card, or other medium for goods, food,
services, credit, or money of at least an equal value, including any electronic card issued by a merchant with a banked dollar value where the issuer has received payment for the full banked dollar value for the future purchase, or
delivery, of goods or services and any certificate issued by a merchant where the issuer has received payment for the full face value of the certificate for future purchases, or delivery, of goods or services.

“Merchant” means an owner or operator of any mercantile establishment or any agent, employee, lessee, consignee, officer, director, franchisee, or independent contractor of such owner or operator.

History.
2005, cc. 269, 303.

§ 59.1-531.
Required disclosures.

Each gift certificate issued by a merchant in the Commonwealth that has an expiration date shall include either (i) a statement of the expiration date of the certificate or (ii) a telephone number or Internet address where the holder of the certificate
may obtain information regarding the expiration date of the certificate.

Each gift certificate issued by a merchant in the Commonwealth that diminishes in value over time shall include a telephone number or Internet address where the holder of the certificate may obtain information regarding the diminution in the value of
the certificate over time.

The information required by this section shall be clearly and permanently imprinted on the certificate.

History.
2005, cc. 269, 303.

§ 59.1-532.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice pursuant to the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of Chapter 17 (§ 59.1-196 et seq.) of this title.

History.
2005, cc. 269, 303.